Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-12,185
Matching funds; receipt; conditions; payment.

(1) Subject to section 81-12,188, an applicant shall be entitled to receive matching funds from the State of Nebraska equal to fifteen percent of the total investment dollars expended on the project, up to fifty million dollars each year or as allowed in section 81-12,189, and not to exceed three hundred million dollars.

(2) Subject to section 81-12,188, the state shall pay the available matching funds to the applicant on an annual basis.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 101;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 187.